Louisiana, session 2026, HB113.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. (A) The provisions of R.S. 17:184, as enacted by Act No. 428 of the 2024
Regular Session of the Legislature, shall have retroactive application to the grades assigned
to students who were enrolled in the ninth grade during the 2023-2024 school year. Each
public school governing authority shall recalculate any grades assigned for those students
during that school year that were not calculated on the ten-point grading scale as provided
in that Section, and the recalculation shall use the same percentage values that were
originally assigned by the teacher when final grades were initially given. The letter grade
assigned for each course based on the ten-point grading scale shall be used for all purposes,
including but not limited to the calculation of a student's cumulative grade point average.
(B) The provisions of Paragraph (A) of this Section shall also apply to charter
schools as provided in R.S. 17:3996(B)(86).
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-216 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 113